Hawaii statutes.
§103D-202 Authority and duties of the
policy board. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the policy
board shall have the authority and responsibility to adopt rules, consistent
with this chapter, governing the procurement, management, control, and disposal
of any and all goods, services, and construction. All rules shall be adopted
in accordance with chapter 91; provided that the policy board shall have the
power to issue interim rules by procurement directives, which shall be exempt
from the public notice, public hearing, and gubernatorial approval requirements
of chapter 91. The interim rules shall be effective for not more than eighteen
months. The policy board shall consider and decide matters of policy within
the scope of this chapter including those referred to it by a chief procurement
officer. The policy board shall have the power to audit and monitor the
implementation of its rules and the requirements of this chapter, but shall not
exercise authority over the award or administration of any particular contract,
or over any dispute, claim, or litigation pertaining thereto. [L Sp 1993, c 8,
pt of §2; am L 1994, c 186, §4; am L 1997, c 352, §23]

Case Notes

Section 3-122-66 (repealed), Hawaii administrative rules, was
invalid because it exceeded the scope of the state procurement policy board's
authority to promulgate rules pursuant to this section; the circuit court did
not err in refusing to declare that the rule "has never been valid and has
always been ultra vires and void ab initio". 132 H. 333, 322 P.3d 228
(2014).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next